tests/data/english-flags.lexc
!!! english-flags.lexc !!!
!!! From: https://fomafst.github.io/morphtut.html#Advanced:_long-distance_dependencies_and_flag_diacritics !!!

Multichar_Symbols +V +Inf +Adj +Pl UN+ @P.UN.ON@ @D.UN@ @C.UN@


LEXICON Root
Prefix;


LEXICON Prefix

@P.UN.ON@UN+:@P.UN.ON@un Verb;
                         Verb;


LEXICON Verb

@C.UN@do      Vinf;
drink         Vinf;
pay           Vinf;


LEXICON Vinf

able                    Adjinf;
@D.UN@+V+Inf:@D.UN@     #;


LEXICON Adjinf

+Adj:0      #;
+Adj+Pl:s   #;
